California, session 20252026, AB2330.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 116025 of the Health and Safety Code is amended to read:116025. “Public swimming pool,” as used in this article, means any public swimming pool, bathhouse, public swimming and bathing place, cold spa, and all related appurtenances.SEC. 2. Section 116026 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:116026. (a) “Cold plunge tub” means any aboveground, individual use therapeutic tub that meets all of the following:(1) Designed and used solely for brief therapeutic or recovery immersion in water.(2) Maintained at temperatures between 35 degrees Fahrenheit and 60 degrees Fahrenheit by use of a mechanical chiller.(3) Has mechanical recirculation.(4) Has an automatic disinfecting system dispensing chlorine or bromine, which could also include the use of ozone or ultraviolet (UV) as a secondary disinfection option.(5) Is not used for swimming or general recreational bathing.(6) Is drained at the end of each operating day and filled at the start of the next operating day.(b) Cold plunge tubs shall not be placed or used within the same enclosure as a public pool or spa.(c) Cold plunge tubs shall have signage posted in a visible area on the tub with a minimum of one-inch letters in contrasting colors indicating the following: “This Cold Plunge Tub is not under health regulation as a public swimming pool, use at your own risk”.(d) Cold plunge tubs are not considered public swimming pools and are not subject to any construction or sanitation standards as set forth in this article and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.SEC. 3. Section 116027 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:116027. (a) “Cold Spa” means any in-ground public swimming pool that is designed and used for brief therapeutic or recovery immersion in water that is maintained at temperatures between 35 degrees Fahrenheit and 60 degrees Fahrenheit by use of a mechanical chiller, or other approved method to chill the water, and can support multiple users at one time.(b) Cold Spas are subject to all applicable requirements related to the construction and operation of a spa or spa pool as prescribed in Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 115950), this chapter, Title 22 (commencing with Section 65501) of the California Code of Regulations, and Title 24 (commencing with Section 3101B) of the California Building Standards Code, except for the requirement that the spa or spa pool must incorporate a water jet system, an aeration system, or a combination of the two systems used in conjunction with heated water, and instead must operate with the use of a chiller, or other approved method, to maintain proper water temperature.SEC. 4. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.